Utah statutes.
19-3-112.   Notification by the department to certain persons of release of radiation from Nevada Test Site -- Notification to certain news outlets.

(1)  When informed by the United States Department of Energy of any release of radiation exceeding the Nuclear Regulatory Commission's limits for unrestricted use in air or water from the Nevada Test Site which is detected outside its boundaries, the department shall, unless prohibited by federal law, immediately convey to the persons specified in Subsection (2) all information that is made available to it, including:

(a)  the date;

(b)  the time and duration of each release of radiation;

(c)  estimates of total amounts of radiation released;

(d)  the types and amounts of each isotope detected off-site;

(e)  the locations of monitoring stations detecting off-site radiation; and

(f)  current and projected wind direction, wind velocity, and precipitation for the region.

(2)  Unless prohibited by federal law, the department shall provide the information required under Subsection (1) to the following:

(a)  members of the Utah congressional delegation or their designated representatives;

(b)  the director of the Division of Emergency Management;

(c)  the attorney general;

(d)  the regional director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency;

(e)  the regional director of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration;

(f)  the executive director of the Utah League of Cities and Towns;

(g)  the executive director of the Department of Health; and

(h)  the chairpersons of the county commissions of affected counties.

(3)  If the state is informed by the United States Department of Energy that any radiation released from the Nevada Test Site has been detected by the United States Department of Energy or United States Environmental Protection Agency or the department within the boundaries of the state of Utah, the department shall, unless prohibited by federal law, immediately provide all information available to it as specified in Subsection (1) to the Associated Press and United Press International outlets in the state.



Amended by Chapter 55, 2011 General Session

